Illinois, session 104th, SB1320.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Airport Authorities Act is amended by 5changing Section 6 as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 5/6)  (from Ch. 15 1/2, par. 68.6)7    Sec. 6. Powers of the board, first meeting, by-laws, etc. 8The Board of Commissioners of an Authority shall possess and 9exercise all of its legislative and executive powers. Within 10thirty days after the appointment of the initial 11commissioners, the board shall meet and elect a chairman. It 12shall then also select a secretary, treasurer and such 13officers or employees as it deems expedient or necessary for 14the accomplishment of its corporate objects, none of whom need 15be a member of the board. The board at said meeting by 16ordinance shall define the first and subsequent fiscal years 17of the Authority, and shall adopt a corporate seal and 18by-laws, which shall determine the times for the annual 19election of officers and of other regular and special meetings 20of the board, and shall contain the rules for the transaction 21of other business of the Authority and for amending such 22by-laws.23    Each commissioner of any such Authority shall devote such   SB1320- 2 -LRB104 08493 RTM 18545 b1time to the duties of such office as the faithful discharge 2thereof may require, and shall be compensated for such 3services upon such basis as the board of commissioners of such 4Authority shall provide by ordinance, and each commissioner 5shall also be reimbursed actual expenses incurred in the 6performance of such official duties, provided, however, in 7airport authorities having a population of not more than 8500,000 the compensation for services of any commissioner 9shall not exceed $300 $150.00 in any one month for services 10within the corporate limits of such Authority or within a 11distance of 50 miles from such corporate limits, and provided, 12further, that in airport authorities having a population of 13more than 500,000, the compensation for services of any 14commissioner shall not exceed the sum of $25,000 $10,000.00 15per annum. 16(Source: P.A. 79-574.)